District of Columbia statutes.
7-215

Marriage registration.

(a)

Each completed application and completed license for each marriage performed in the District on or after the effective date of this chapter shall be filed with the Registrar and shall be registered if it has been completed and filed in accordance with this chapter.

(b)

The Court shall complete and forward to the Registrar on or before the 30th day of each calendar month the completed applications and completed licenses returned to the Court during the preceding calendar month.

(c)

A marriage record not filed within the required time may be registered according to regulations issued by the Registrar.

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 16, 28 DCR 3271
1981 Ed., § 6-215.